New York, session 2025-2026, A10948.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph a of subdivision 4 of section 2 162 of the state finance law, as amended by section 164 of subpart B of 3 part C of chapter 62 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) When commodities are available, in the form, function and utility 5 required by a state agency, public authority, commission, public benefit 6 corporation or political subdivision, said commodities [must] may be 7 purchased first from the correctional industries program of the depart- 8 ment of corrections and community supervision; 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04807-01-5